Illinois, session 104th, SB233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 402 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/402)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1402)7    Sec. 402. Except as otherwise authorized by this Act, it 8is unlawful for any person knowingly to possess a controlled 9or counterfeit substance or controlled substance analog. A 10violation of this Act with respect to each of the controlled 11substances listed herein constitutes a single and separate 12violation of this Act. For purposes of this Section, 13"controlled substance analog" or "analog" means a substance, 14other than a controlled substance, which is not approved by 15the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if 16approved, is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with 17State or federal law, and that has a chemical structure 18substantially similar to that of a controlled substance in 19Schedule I or II, or that was specifically designed to produce 20an effect substantially similar to that of a controlled 21substance in Schedule I or II. Examples of chemical classes in 22which controlled substance analogs are found include, but are 23not limited to, the following: phenethylamines, N-substituted   SB0233- 2 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1piperidines, morphinans, ecgonines, quinazolinones, 2substituted indoles, and arylcycloalkylamines. For purposes of 3this Act, a controlled substance analog shall be treated in 4the same manner as the controlled substance to which it is 5substantially similar. 6    (a) Any person who violates this Section with respect to 7the following controlled or counterfeit substances and 8amounts, notwithstanding any of the provisions of subsections 9(c) and (d) to the contrary, is guilty of a Class 1 felony and 10shall, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, be sentenced as 11provided in this subsection (a) and fined as provided in 12subsection (b):13        (1) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 14        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 15        100 grams of a substance containing heroin or 16        fentanyl;17            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 18        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 19        400 grams of a substance containing heroin;20            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 21        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 22        900 grams of any substance containing heroin;23            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 24        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 25        substance containing heroin;26        (2) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15   SB0233- 3 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 2        100 grams of any substance containing cocaine;3            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 4        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 5        400 grams of any substance containing cocaine;6            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 7        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 8        900 grams of any substance containing cocaine;9            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 10        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 11        substance containing cocaine;12        (3) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 13        years with respect to 15 grams or more but less than 14        100 grams of any substance containing morphine;15            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 16        years with respect to 100 grams or more but less than 17        400 grams of any substance containing morphine;18            (C) not less than 6 years and not more than 40 19        years with respect to 400 grams or more but less than 20        900 grams of any substance containing morphine;21            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 22        years with respect to 900 grams or more of any 23        substance containing morphine;24        (4) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 25    peyote;26        (5) 200 grams or more of any substance containing a   SB0233- 4 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1    derivative of barbituric acid or any of the salts of a 2    derivative of barbituric acid;3        (6) 200 grams or more of any substance containing 4    amphetamine or any salt of an optical isomer of 5    amphetamine;6        (6.5) (blank);7        (7) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 8        years with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less 9        than 100 grams of any substance containing lysergic 10        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 11        15 or more objects or 15 or more segregated parts of an 12        object or objects but less than 200 objects or 200 13        segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 14        them or having upon them any amount of any substance 15        containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an 16        analog thereof;17            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 18        years with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less 19        than 400 grams of any substance containing lysergic 20        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 21        200 or more objects or 200 or more segregated parts of 22        an object or objects but less than 600 objects or less 23        than 600 segregated parts of an object or objects 24        containing in them or having upon them any amount of 25        any substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide 26        (LSD), or an analog thereof;  SB0233- 5 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 2        years with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less 3        than 900 grams of any substance containing lysergic 4        acid diethylamide (LSD), or an analog thereof, or (ii) 5        600 or more objects or 600 or more segregated parts of 6        an object or objects but less than 1500 objects or 1500 7        segregated parts of an object or objects containing in 8        them or having upon them any amount of any substance 9        containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), or an 10        analog thereof;11            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 12        years with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any 13        substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), 14        or an analog thereof, or (ii) 1500 or more objects or 15        1500 or more segregated parts of an object or objects 16        containing in them or having upon them any amount of a 17        substance containing lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD), 18        or an analog thereof;19        (7.5) (A) not less than 4 years and not more than 15 20        years with respect to: (i) 15 grams or more but less 21        than 100 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 22        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 23        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 24        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 25        (ii) 15 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 26        objects but less than 200 pills, tablets, caplets,   SB0233- 6 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 2        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 3        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 4        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 5        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;6            (B) not less than 6 years and not more than 30 7        years with respect to: (i) 100 grams or more but less 8        than 400 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 9        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 10        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 11        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 12        (ii) 200 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 13        objects but less than 600 pills, tablets, caplets, 14        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 15        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 16        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 17        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 18        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;19            (C) not less than 8 years and not more than 40 20        years with respect to: (i) 400 grams or more but less 21        than 900 grams of any substance listed in paragraph 22        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 23        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 24        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof, or 25        (ii) 600 or more pills, tablets, caplets, capsules, or 26        objects but less than 1,500 pills, tablets, caplets,   SB0233- 7 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1        capsules, or objects containing in them or having upon 2        them any amount of any substance listed in paragraph 3        (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), (14.1), (19), (20), 4        (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of subsection (d) of 5        Section 204, or an analog or derivative thereof;6            (D) not less than 10 years and not more than 50 7        years with respect to: (i) 900 grams or more of any 8        substance listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), 9        (3), (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) 10        of subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 11        derivative thereof, or (ii) 1,500 or more pills, 12        tablets, caplets, capsules, or objects containing in 13        them or having upon them any amount of a substance 14        listed in paragraph (1), (2), (2.1), (2.2), (3), 15        (14.1), (19), (20), (20.1), (21), (25), or (26) of 16        subsection (d) of Section 204, or an analog or 17        derivative thereof;18        (8) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 19    pentazocine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 20    isomers of pentazocine, or an analog thereof;21        (9) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 22    methaqualone or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 23    isomers of methaqualone;24        (10) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 25    phencyclidine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of 26    isomers of phencyclidine (PCP);  SB0233- 8 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1        (10.5) 30 grams or more of any substance containing 2    ketamine or any of the salts, isomers and salts of isomers 3    of ketamine;4        (11) 200 grams or more of any substance containing any 5    substance classified as a narcotic drug in Schedules I or 6    II, or an analog thereof, which is not otherwise included 7    in this subsection.8    (b) Any person sentenced with respect to violations of 9paragraph (1), (2), (3), (7), or (7.5) of subsection (a) 10involving 100 grams or more of the controlled substance named 11therein, may in addition to the penalties provided therein, be 12fined an amount not to exceed $200,000 or the full street value 13of the controlled or counterfeit substances, whichever is 14greater. The term "street value" shall have the meaning 15ascribed in Section 110-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 161963. Any person sentenced with respect to any other provision 17of subsection (a), may in addition to the penalties provided 18therein, be fined an amount not to exceed $200,000.19    (c) Any person who violates this Section with regard to an 20amount of a controlled substance other than methamphetamine or 21counterfeit substance not set forth in subsection (a) or (d) 22is guilty of a Class 4 felony. The fine for a violation 23punishable under this subsection (c) shall not be more than 24$25,000.25    (d) Any person who violates this Section with regard to 26any amount of anabolic steroid is guilty of a Class C   SB0233- 9 -LRB104 03853 RLC 13877 b1misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class B misdemeanor 2for a subsequent offense committed within 2 years of a prior 3conviction.4(Source: P.A. 99-371, eff. 1-1-16; 100-368, eff. 1-1-18.)